Hawaii statutes.
[§145D-3] Sale of donated food, prohibited;
fines. (a) No person or organization shall sell, or offer for sale, any
food product donated or distributed under this chapter.

(b) Any violation of this section is
punishable by a fine not to exceed $1,000. [L 1982, c 260, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next